Maryland, session 2025, HB0954.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–926.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0954*

HOUSE BILL 954
ANY EVIDENCE OBTAINED THROUGH THE USE OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT IN
VIOLATION OF § 1–702 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE IS INADMISSIBLE IN ANY
CRIMINAL, CIVIL, OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDING.
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 7. USE OF UNMANNED AIRCRAFT BY STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT.
1–701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “AIRCRAFT” MEANS A DEVICE THAT IS USED OR INTENDED TO BE USED
FOR FLIGHT IN THE AIR.
(C) “UNMANNED AIRCRAFT” MEANS AN AIRCRAFT THAT IS OPERATED
WITHOUT THE POSSIBILITY OF DIRECT HUMAN INTERVENTION FROM WITHIN OR ON
THE AIRCRAFT.
1–702.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A UNIT OF
STATE GOVERNMENT OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE MAY NOT:
(1) DEPLOY OR OPERATE AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT FOR
SURVEILLANCE, EVIDENCE COLLECTION, OR ANY OTHER PURPOSE; OR
(2) USE INFORMATION ACQUIRED THROUGH THE USE OF AN
UNMANNED AIRCRAFT OPERATED BY ANY ENTITY, WHETHER PUBLIC OR PRIVATE.
(B) A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT OR A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE MAY DEPLOY OR OPERATE AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT:
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH A VALID SEARCH WARRANT ISSUED BY A
JUDGE;
(2) AT A LOCATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF EXECUTING AN ARREST
WARRANT;
(3) IN FRESH PURSUIT OF A SUSPECT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–301
OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 954 3
(4) TO ASSIST IN AN ACTIVE SEARCH AND RESCUE OPERATION;
(5) TO LOCATE AN ESCAPED PRISONER;
(6) IF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER REASONABLY BELIEVES THAT
THE USE OF AIRCRAFT IS NECESSARY TO PREVENT IMMINENT SERIOUS BODILY
HARM TO AN INDIVIDUAL; OR
(7) IF THE UNITED STATES SECRETARY OF HOMELAND SECURITY
DETERMINES THAT CREDIBLE INTELLIGENCE INDICATES THAT THERE IS A HIGH
RISK OF A TERRORIST ATTACK BY A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL OR ORGANIZATION AND
THAT USE OF AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT IS NECESSARY TO COUNTER THE RISK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.